Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-326
Fertilizer trailer, defined.

Fertilizer trailer means any trailer, including gooseneck applicators or trailers, designed and used exclusively to carry or apply agricultural fertilizer or agricultural chemicals and having a gross weight, including load thereon, of twenty thousand pounds or less.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 26.